District of Columbia statutes.
2-352.03

Office of Contracting and Procurement.

(a)

The agency head of the Office of Contracting and Procurement shall be the Chief Procurement Officer.

(b)

The CPO shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council pursuant to § 1-523.01.

(c)

On April 8, 2011, the incumbent CPO shall continue to serve as the CPO. If the incumbent CPO is unable to serve as the CPO, until a new CPO is appointed by the Mayor pursuant to § 1-523.01, the highest ranking employee of OCP shall serve as acting CPO.

(d)

The CPO shall have not less than 5 years of senior-level experience in procurement and shall have demonstrated, through knowledge and experience, the ability to administer a public procurement system of the size and complexity of the program established by this chapter.

(e)

The CPO shall serve for one 5-year term and may be reappointed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(f)

The CPO shall not be removed from office before the expiration of the 5-year term except for cause, subject to the right of appeal as provided in subchapter VI of Chapter 6 of Title 1. [§ 1-606.01 et seq.].

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 203, 58 DCR 1185

History